nl: Barcodescanner-interface: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Toetsenbordwig; Bliksem; PS/2; Eigen connector; RS-232; Serieel; USB; USB type-C; Draadloos (RF); Andere
pt-PT: Interface do leitor de código de barras: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Interface de teclado; Raio; PS/2; Conetor proprietário; RS-232; Em série; USB; USB type-C; Sem fios (FR); Outro
hu: Vonalkód-leolvasó interfésze: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Keyboard Wedge; Lightning; PS/2; Saját fejlesztésű csatlakozó; RS-232; Soros; USB; USB-C; Vezeték nélküli (RF); Egyéb
sl-SI: Vmesnik čitalnika črtne kode: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Zagozda za tipkovnico; Lightning; PS/2; Lastniški priključek; RS-232; Serijski; USB; USB tipa C; Brezžično (RF); Drugo
sk-SK: Rozhranie skenera čiarových kódov: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Klávesnicový klin; Blesk; PS/2; Vlastný konektor; RS-232; Sériový; USB; USB typu C; Bezdrôtový (RF); Iné
en: Barcode scanner interface: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Keyboard wedge; Lightning; PS/2; Proprietary connector; RS-232; Serial; USB; USB type-C; Wireless (RF); Other
ro-RO: Interfață scaner coduri de bare: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Interfață pentru tastatură (wedge); Lightning; PS/2; Conector brevetat; RS-232; Serial; USB; USB tip C; Fără fir (RF); Altele
nb: Grensesnitt for strekkodeskannere: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Tastaturkile; Lightning; PS/2; Proprietær kontakt; RS-232; Seriell; USB; USB type-C; Trådløs (RF); Annet
hr-HR: Sučelje skenera crtičnog koda: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Adapter za tipkovnicu; Osvjetljenje; PS/2; Vlasnički konektor; RS-232; Serijski; USB; USB tip-C; Bežični (RF); Ostalo
ko: 바코드 스캐너 인터페이스: Bluetooth; 이더넷; 키보드 웨지; Lightning; PS/2; 독점 커넥터; RS-232; 시리얼; USB; USB 타입-C; 무선(RF); 기타
vi: Giao diện máy quét mã vạch: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Loại dùng cổng Keyboard; Lightning; PS/2; Đầu nối độc quyền; RS-232; Tạp chí; USB; USB type-C; Không dây (RF); Khác
sv: Gränssnitt för streckkodsläsare: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Tangentbordskil; Belysning; PS/2; Proprietär kontakt; RS-232; Seriell; USB; USB typ-C; Trådlös (RF); Övrigt
th: อินเตอร์เฟซเครื่องสแกนบาร์โค้ด: บลูทูธ; อีเทอร์เน็ต; คีย์บอร์ดขนาดเล็ก; สายไลท์นิง; PS/2; ตัวเชื่อมต่อที่มีกรรมสิทธิ์; RS-232; แบบอนุกรม; USB; USB Type-C; ไร้สาย (คลื่นวิทยุ); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Interface do leitor de código de barras: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Keyboard wedge; Raio; PS/2; Conector proprietário; RS-232; Serial; USB; USB tipo C; Sem fio (RF); Outro
fi: Viivakoodinlukijan käyttöliittymä: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Kosketinsoittimen kiila; Lightning; PS/2; Oma liitin; RS-232; Seriaali; USB; USB tyyppi C; Langaton (RF); Muu
pl: Interfejs skanera kodów kreskowych: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Klin pod klawiaturę; Lightning; PS/2; Złącze własne; RS-232; Szeregowe; USB; USB typu C; Bezprzewodowe; Inne
es: Interfaz de escáner de códigos de barras: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Teclado de cuña; Lightning; PS/2; Conector propietario; RS-232; Serie; USB; USB tipo C; Inalámbrico (RF); Otros
ja: バーコードリーダースタンド: Bluetooth; イーサネット; キーボードウェッジ; Lightning; PS/2; 独自コネクタ; RS-232; シリアル; USB; USBタイプC; 無線 (RF); その他
ru: Интерфейс сканера штрихкодов: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Электронный соединитель; Lightning; PS/2; Фирменный соединитель; RS-232; Последовательный; USB; USB Type-C; Беспроводной (РЧ); Другой
bg-BG: Интерфейс на скенера за баркодове: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Клин за клавиатура; Осветение; PS/2; Собствен конектор; RS-232; Сериен; USB; USB type-C; Безжичен (RF); Други
da: Stregkodescannergrænseflade: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Tastaturkile; Lyn; PS/2; Proprietært stik; RS-232; Seriel; USB; USB type-C; Trådløs (RF); Andet
it: Interfaccia dello scanner per codici a barre: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Emulazione tastiera; Illuminazione; PS/2; Connettore proprietario; RS-232; Seriale; USB; USB tipo C; Senza fili (RF); Altro
lt-LT: Brūkšninių kodų skaitytuvo sąsaja: „Bluetooth“; Eternetas; Specialusis klaviatūros klavišas; Apšvietimas; PS/2; Patentuota jungtis; RS-232; Serijinis; USB; USB C tipo; Belaidis (RF); Kita
fr: Interface de lecteur de codes-barres: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Cale de clavier; Lightning; PS/2; Connecteur propriétaire; RS-232; Série; USB; USB type C; Sans fil (RF); Autre
de: Barcodescanner-Schnittstelle: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Keyboard Wedge; Lightning; PS/2; Proprietärer Anschluss; RS-232; Seriell; USB; USB-Typ-C; Kabellos (RF); Sonstiges
zh-TW: 條碼掃描器介面: 藍牙; 乙太網路; 轉譯鍵盤; 閃電; 個人電腦連接埠; 充電樁; 異步傳輸標準接口; 序列; USB; USB Type-C; 無線射頻; 其他
el: Διεπαφή σαρωτή γραμμωτού κώδικα: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Keyboard wedge; Lightning; PS/2; Ιδιόκτητο λογισμικό σύνδεσης; RS-232; Σειριακή; USB; USB type-C; Ασύρματη (RF); Άλλο
tr: Barkod Tarayıcı Arayüzü: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Klavye takozu; Lightning; PS/2; Tescilli konnektör; RS-232; Seri; USB; USB C tipi; Kablosuz (RF); Diğer
zh-CN: 条码扫描器接口: 蓝牙; 以太网; 键盘插槽; 闪电; PS/2; 专用连接器; RS-232; 串行; USB; USB C 型; 无线 (RF); 其他
cs: Rozhraní čtečky čárových kódů: Bluetooth; Ethernet; Keyboard Wedge; Lightning; PS/2; Vlastní konektor; RS-232; Sériová; USB; USB Type-C; Bezdrátové (RF); Jiné